Missouri, session 2026, SB991.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 324.001, 324.028, 324.400, 324.402,
324.403, 324.406, 324.409, 324.412, 324.415, 324.418, 324.421,
324.424, 324.427, 324.430, 324.433, 324.436, 324.439, 327.011,
327.031, 327.041, 327.081, 327.381, 327.411, 327.442, 327.451,
537.033, and 621.045, RSMo, are repealed and twenty-two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
324.001, 324.028, 327.011, 327.031, 327.041, 327.081, 327.381,
327.411, 327.442, 327.451, 327.700, 327.705, 327.710, 327.720,
327.725, 327.730, 327.735, 327.740, 327.745, 327.750, 537.033,
and 621.045, to read as follows:
324.001. 1. For the purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of commerce and
insurance;
(2) "Director", the director of the division of
professional registration; and


(3) "Division", the division of professional
registration.
2. There is hereby established a "Division of
Professional Registration" assigned to the department of
commerce and insurance as a type III transfer, headed by a
director appointed by the governor with the advice and
consent of the senate. All of the general provisions,
definitions and powers enumerated in section 1 of the
Omnibus State Reorganization Act of 1974 and Executive Order
06-04 shall apply to this department and its divisions,
agencies, and personnel.
3. The director of the division of professional
registration shall promulgate rules and regulations which
designate for each board or commission assigned to the
division the renewal date for licenses or certificates.
After the initial establishment of renewal dates, no
director of the division shall promulgate a rule or
regulation which would change the renewal date for licenses
or certificates if such change in renewal date would occur
prior to the date on which the renewal date in effect at the
time such new renewal date is specified next occurs. Each
board or commission shall by rule or regulation establish
licensing periods of one, two, or three years. Registration
fees set by a board or commission shall be effective for the
entire licensing period involved, and shall not be increased
during any current licensing period. Persons who are
required to pay their first registration fees shall be
allowed to pay the pro rata share of such fees for the
remainder of the period remaining at the time the fees are
paid. Each board or commission shall provide the necessary
forms for initial registration, and thereafter the director
may prescribe standard forms for renewal of licenses and
certificates. Each board or commission shall by rule and


regulation require each applicant to provide the information
which is required to keep the board's records current. Each
board or commission shall have the authority to collect and
analyze information required to support workforce planning
and policy development. Such information shall not be
publicly disclosed so as to identify a specific health care
provider, as defined in section 376.1350. Each board or
commission shall issue the original license or certificate.
4. The division shall provide clerical and other staff
services relating to the issuance and renewal of licenses
for all the professional licensing and regulating boards and
commissions assigned to the division. The division shall
perform the financial management and clerical functions as
they each relate to issuance and renewal of licenses and
certificates. "Issuance and renewal of licenses and
certificates" means the ministerial function of preparing
and delivering licenses or certificates, and obtaining
material and information for the board or commission in
connection with the renewal thereof to include verifying if
the applicant has submitted all required documentation and
that the documentation is legible. It does not include any
discretionary authority with regard to the original review
of an applicant's qualifications for licensure or
certification, or the subsequent review of licensee's or
certificate holder's qualifications, or any disciplinary
action contemplated against the licensee or certificate
holder. The division may develop and implement microfilming
systems and automated or manual management information
systems.
5. The director of the division shall maintain a
system of accounting and budgeting, in cooperation with the
director of the department, the office of administration,
and the state auditor's office, to ensure proper charges are


made to the various boards for services rendered to them.
The general assembly shall appropriate to the division and
other state agencies from each board's funds moneys
sufficient to reimburse the division and other state
agencies for all services rendered and all facilities and
supplies furnished to that board.
6. For accounting purposes, the appropriation to the
division and to the office of administration for the payment
of rent for quarters provided for the division shall be made
from the "Professional Registration Fees Fund", which is
hereby created, and is to be used solely for the purpose
defined in subsection 5 of this section. The fund shall
consist of moneys deposited into it from each board's fund.
Each board shall contribute a prorated amount necessary to
fund the division for services rendered and rent based upon
the system of accounting and budgeting established by the
director of the division as provided in subsection 5 of this
section. Transfers of funds to the professional
registration fees fund shall be made by each board on July
first of each year; provided, however, that the director of
the division may establish an alternative date or dates of
transfers at the request of any board. Such transfers shall
be made until they equal the prorated amount for services
rendered and rent by the division. The provisions of
section 33.080 to the contrary notwithstanding, money in
this fund shall not be transferred and placed to the credit
of general revenue.
100 7. The director of the division shall be responsible
101 for collecting and accounting for all moneys received by the
102 division or its component agencies. Any money received by a
103 board or commission shall be promptly given, identified by
104 type and source, to the director. The director shall keep a
105 record by board and state accounting system classification


106 of the amount of revenue the director receives. The
107 director shall promptly transmit all receipts to the
108 department of revenue for deposit in the state treasury to
109 the credit of the appropriate fund. The director shall
110 provide each board with all relevant financial information
111 in a timely fashion. Each board shall cooperate with the
112 director by providing necessary information.
113 8. All educational transcripts, test scores,
114 complaints, investigatory reports, and information
115 pertaining to any person who is an applicant or licensee of
116 any agency assigned to the division of professional
117 registration by statute or by the department are
118 confidential and may not be disclosed to the public or any
119 member of the public, except with the written consent of the
120 person whose records are involved. The agency which
121 possesses the records or information shall disclose the
122 records or information if the person whose records or
123 information is involved has consented to the disclosure.
124 Each agency is entitled to the attorney-client privilege and
125 work-product privilege to the same extent as any other
126 person. Provided, however, that any board may disclose
127 confidential information without the consent of the person
128 involved in the course of voluntary interstate exchange of
129 information, or in the course of any litigation concerning
130 that person, or pursuant to a lawful request, or to other
131 administrative or law enforcement agencies acting within the
132 scope of their statutory authority. Information regarding
133 identity, including names and addresses, registration, and
134 currency of the license of the persons possessing licenses
135 to engage in a professional occupation and the names and
136 addresses of applicants for such licenses is not
137 confidential information.


138 9. Any deliberations conducted and votes taken in
139 rendering a final decision after a hearing before an agency
140 assigned to the division shall be closed to the parties and
141 the public. Once a final decision is rendered, that
142 decision shall be made available to the parties and the
143 public.
144 10. A compelling governmental interest shall be deemed
145 to exist for the purposes of section 536.025 for licensure
146 fees to be reduced by emergency rule, if the projected fund
147 balance of any agency assigned to the division of
148 professional registration is reasonably expected to exceed
149 an amount that would require transfer from that fund to
150 general revenue.
151 11. (1) The following boards and commissions are
152 assigned by specific type transfers to the division of
153 professional registration: Missouri state board of
154 accountancy, chapter 326; board of cosmetology and barber
155 examiners, chapters 328 and 329; Missouri board for
156 architects, professional engineers, professional land
157 surveyors [and], professional landscape architects, and
158 licensed interior designers, chapter 327; Missouri state
159 board of chiropractic examiners, chapter 331; state board of
160 registration for the healing arts, chapter 334; Missouri
161 dental board, chapter 332; state board of embalmers and
162 funeral directors, chapter 333; state board of optometry,
163 chapter 336; Missouri state board of nursing, chapter 335;
164 board of pharmacy, chapter 338; state board of podiatric
165 medicine, chapter 330; Missouri real estate appraisers
166 commission, chapter 339; and Missouri veterinary medical
167 board, chapter 340. The governor shall appoint members of
168 these boards by and with the advice and consent of the
169 senate.


170 (2) The boards and commissions assigned to the
171 division shall exercise all their respective statutory
172 duties and powers, except those clerical and other staff
173 services involving collecting and accounting for moneys and
174 financial management relating to the issuance and renewal of
175 licenses, which services shall be provided by the division,
176 within the appropriation therefor. Nothing herein shall
177 prohibit employment of professional examining or testing
178 services from professional associations or others as
179 required by the boards or commissions on contract. Nothing
180 herein shall be construed to affect the power of a board or
181 commission to expend its funds as appropriated. However,
182 the division shall review the expense vouchers of each
183 board. The results of such review shall be submitted to the
184 board reviewed and to the house and senate appropriations
185 committees annually.
186 (3) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the
187 director of the division shall exercise only those
188 management functions of the boards and commissions
189 specifically provided in the Reorganization Act of 1974, and
190 those relating to the allocation and assignment of space,
191 personnel other than board personnel, and equipment.
192 (4) "Board personnel", as used in this section or
193 chapters 317, 326, 327, 328, 329, 330, 331, 332, 333, 334,
194 335, 336, 337, 338, 339, 340, and 345, shall mean personnel
195 whose functions and responsibilities are in areas not
196 related to the clerical duties involving the issuance and
197 renewal of licenses, to the collecting and accounting for
198 moneys, or to financial management relating to issuance and
199 renewal of licenses; specifically included are executive
200 secretaries (or comparable positions), consultants,
201 inspectors, investigators, counsel, and secretarial support
202 staff for these positions; and such other positions as are


203 established and authorized by statute for a particular board
204 or commission. Boards and commissions may employ legal
205 counsel, if authorized by law, and temporary personnel if
206 the board is unable to meet its responsibilities with the
207 employees authorized above. Any board or commission which
208 hires temporary employees shall annually provide the
209 division director and the appropriation committees of the
210 general assembly with a complete list of all persons
211 employed in the previous year, the length of their
212 employment, the amount of their remuneration, and a
213 description of their responsibilities.
214 (5) Board personnel for each board or commission shall
215 be employed by and serve at the pleasure of the board or
216 commission, shall be supervised as the board or commission
217 designates, and shall have their duties and compensation
218 prescribed by the board or commission, within appropriations
219 for that purpose, except that compensation for board
220 personnel shall not exceed that established for comparable
221 positions as determined by the board or commission pursuant
222 to the job and pay plan of the department of commerce and
223 insurance. Nothing herein shall be construed to permit
224 salaries for any board personnel to be lowered except by
225 board action.
226 12. All the powers, duties, and functions of the
227 division of athletics, chapter 317, and others, are assigned
228 by type I transfer to the division of professional
229 registration.
230 13. Wherever the laws, rules, or regulations of this
231 state make reference to the division of professional
232 registration of the department of economic development, such
233 references shall be deemed to refer to the division of
234 professional registration.


235 14. (1) The state board of nursing, board of
236 pharmacy, Missouri dental board, state committee of
237 psychologists, state board of chiropractic examiners, state
238 board of optometry, Missouri board of occupational therapy,
239 or state board of registration for the healing arts may
240 individually or collectively enter into a contractual
241 agreement with the department of health and senior services,
242 a public institution of higher education, or a nonprofit
243 entity for the purpose of collecting and analyzing workforce
244 data from its licensees, registrants, or permit holders for
245 future workforce planning and to assess the accessibility
246 and availability of qualified health care services and
247 practitioners in Missouri. The boards shall work
248 collaboratively with other state governmental entities to
249 ensure coordination and avoid duplication of efforts.
250 (2) The boards may expend appropriated funds necessary
251 for operational expenses of the program formed under this
252 subsection. Each board is authorized to accept grants to
253 fund the collection or analysis authorized in this
254 subsection. Any such funds shall be deposited in the
255 respective board's fund.
256 (3) Data collection shall be controlled and approved
257 by the applicable state board conducting or requesting the
258 collection. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections
259 324.010 and 334.001, the boards may release identifying data
260 to the contractor to facilitate data analysis of the health
261 care workforce including, but not limited to, geographic,
262 demographic, and practice or professional characteristics of
263 licensees. The state board shall not request or be
264 authorized to collect income or other financial earnings
265 data.
266 (4) Data collected under this subsection shall be
267 deemed the property of the state board requesting the data.


268 Data shall be maintained by the state board in accordance
269 with chapter 610, provided that any information deemed
270 closed or confidential under subsection 8 of this section or
271 any other provision of state law shall not be disclosed
272 without consent of the applicable licensee or entity or as
273 otherwise authorized by law. Data shall only be released in
274 an aggregate form by geography, profession or professional
275 specialization, or population characteristic in a manner
276 that cannot be used to identify a specific individual or
277 entity. Data suppression standards shall be addressed and
278 established in the contractual agreement.
279 (5) Contractors shall maintain the security and
280 confidentiality of data received or collected under this
281 subsection and shall not use, disclose, or release any data
282 without approval of the applicable state board. The
283 contractual agreement between the applicable state board and
284 contractor shall establish a data release and research
285 review policy to include legal and institutional review
286 board, or agency-equivalent, approval.
287 (6) Each board may promulgate rules subject to the
288 provisions of this subsection and chapter 536 to effectuate
289 and implement the workforce data collection and analysis
290 authorized by this subsection. Any rule or portion of a
291 rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
292 created under the authority delegated in this section shall
293 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
294 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
295 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
296 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
297 general assembly under chapter 536 to review, to delay the
298 effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
299 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of


300 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
301 August 28, 2016, shall be invalid and void.
324.028. Any member authorized under the provisions of
sections 256.459, 324.063, 324.177, 324.203, 324.243,
[324.406,] 324.478, 326.259, 327.031, 329.015, 330.110,
331.090, 332.021, 333.151, 334.120, 334.430, 334.625,
334.717, 334.749, 334.830, 335.021, 336.130, 337.050,
337.305, 337.535, 337.622, 337.739, 338.110, 339.120,
340.202, 345.080, and 346.120 who misses three consecutive
regularly scheduled meetings of the board or council on
which he or she serves shall forfeit his or her membership
on that board or council. A new member shall be appointed
to the respective board or council by the governor with the
advice and consent of the senate.
327.011. As used in this chapter, the following words
and terms shall have the meanings indicated:
(1) "Accredited degree program from a school of
architecture", a degree from any school or other institution
which teaches architecture and whose curricula for the
degree in question have been, at the time in question,
certified as accredited by the National Architectural
Accrediting Board;
(2) "Accredited degree program from a school of
interior design", a degree from any school or other
institution which teaches interior design and whose
curricula for the degree in question have been, at the time
in question, certified as accredited by the Council for
Interior Design Accreditation or an accreditation body
recognized by the United States Department of Education;
(3) "Accredited school of engineering", any school or
other institution which teaches engineering and whose
curricula on the subjects in question are or have been, at
the time in question certified as accredited by the


engineering accreditation commission of the accreditation
board for engineering and technology or its successor
organization;
[(3)] (4) "Accredited school of landscape
architecture", any school or other institution which teaches
landscape architecture and whose curricula on the subjects
in question are or have been at the times in question
certified as accredited by the Landscape Architecture
Accreditation Board of the American Society of Landscape
Architects;
[(4)] (5) "Architect", any person authorized pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter to practice architecture
in Missouri, as the practice of architecture is defined in
section 327.091;
[(5)] (6) "Board", the Missouri board for architects,
professional engineers, professional land surveyors [and],
professional landscape architects, and licensed interior
designers;
[(6)] (7) "Corporation", any general business
corporation, professional corporation or limited liability
company;
[(7)] (8) "Design coordination", the review and
coordination of technical submissions prepared by others
including, as appropriate and without limitation,
architects, professional engineers, professional land
surveyors, professional landscape architects, licensed
interior designers, and other consultants;
[(8)] (9) "Design survey", a survey which includes all
activities required to gather information to support the
sound conception, planning, design, construction,
maintenance, and operation of design projects, but excludes
the surveying of real property for the establishment of land
boundaries, rights-of-way, easements, and the dependent or


independent surveys or resurveys of the public land survey
system;
[(9)] (10) "Incidental practice", the performance of
other professional services licensed under this chapter that
are related to a licensee's professional service, but are
secondary and substantially less in scope and magnitude when
compared to the professional services usually and normally
performed by the licensee practicing in their licensed
profession. This incidental professional service shall be
safely and competently performed by the licensee without
jeopardizing the health, safety, and welfare of the public.
The licensee shall be qualified by education, training, and
experience as determined by the board and in sections
327.091, 327.181, 327.272, [and] 327.600, and 327.700 and
applicable board rules to perform such incidental
professional service;
(11) "Licensed interior designer", any person
authorized pursuant to the provisions of this chapter to
practice as a licensed interior designer in Missouri, as the
practice of licensed interior design is defined in section
327.700;
[(10)] (12) "Licensee", a person licensed to practice
any profession regulated under this chapter or a corporation
authorized to practice any such profession;
[(11)] (13) "Partnership", any partnership or limited
liability partnership;
[(12)] (14) "Person", any individual, corporation,
firm, partnership, association or other entity authorized to
do business;
[(13)] (15) "Professional engineer", any person
authorized pursuant to the provisions of this chapter to
practice as a professional engineer in Missouri, as the
practice of engineering is defined in section 327.181;


[(14)] (16) "Professional land surveyor", any person
authorized pursuant to the provisions of this chapter to
practice as a professional land surveyor in Missouri as the
practice of land surveying is defined in section 327.272;
[(15)] (17) "Professional landscape architect", any
person authorized pursuant to the provisions of this chapter
to practice as a professional landscape architect in
Missouri as the practice of professional landscape
architecture is defined in section 327.600;
[(16)] (18) "Responsible charge", the independent
direct control of a licensee's work and personal supervision
of such work pertaining to the practice of architecture,
engineering, land surveying, [or] landscape architecture, or
interior design.
327.031. 1. The "Missouri Board for Architects,
Professional Engineers, Professional Land Surveyors [and],
Professional Landscape Architects, and Licensed Interior
Designers" is hereby established and shall consist of
[fifteen] seventeen members: a chairperson, who may be
either an architect, a professional engineer, a professional
land surveyor, [or] a professional landscape architect, or a
licensed interior designer; three architects, who shall
constitute the architectural division of the board; four
professional engineers, who shall constitute its
professional engineering division; three professional land
surveyors, who shall constitute its professional land
surveying division; three professional landscape architects,
who shall constitute its professional landscape
architectural division; two licensed interior designers, who
shall constitute its licensed interior design division; and
a voting public member.
2. After receiving his or her commission and before
entering upon the discharge of his or her official duties,


each member of the board shall take, subscribe to and file
in the office of the secretary of state the official oath
required by the constitution.
3. The chairperson shall be the administrative and
executive officer of the board, and it shall be his or her
duty to supervise and expedite the work of the board and its
divisions, and, at his or her election, when a tie exists
between the divisions of the board, to break the tie by
recording his or her vote for or against the action upon
which the divisions are in disagreement. Each member of the
architectural division shall have one vote when voting on an
action pending before the board; each member of the
professional engineering division shall have one vote when
voting on an action pending before the board; each member of
the professional land surveying division shall have one vote
when voting on an action pending before the board; [and]
each member of the professional landscape architectural
division shall have one vote when voting on an action
pending before the board; and each member of the licensed
interior design division shall have one vote when voting on
an action pending before the board. Every motion or
proposed action upon which the divisions of the board are
tied shall be deemed lost, and the chairperson shall so
declare, unless the chairperson shall elect to break the tie
as provided in this section. [Eight] Nine voting members of
the board, including at least one member of each division,
shall constitute a quorum, respectively, for the transaction
of board business.
4. Each division of the board shall, at its first
meeting in each even-numbered year, elect one of its members
as division chairperson for a term of two years. Two voting
members of each division of the board shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of division business. The


chairpersons of the architectural division, professional
engineering division, professional land surveying division,
[and] professional landscape architectural division, and
licensed interior design division so elected shall be vice
chairpersons of the board[, and]. When the chairperson of
the board is an architect, the chairperson of the
architectural division shall be the ranking vice
chairperson[, and]; when the chairperson of the board is a
professional engineer, the chairperson of the professional
engineering division shall be the ranking vice
chairperson[,]; when the chairperson of the board is a
professional land surveyor, the chairperson of the
professional land surveying division shall be the ranking
vice chairperson[, and]; when the chairperson of the board
is a professional landscape architect, the chairperson of
the professional landscape architectural division shall be
the ranking vice chairperson; and when the chairperson of
the board is a licensed interior designer, the chairperson
of the licensed interior design division shall be the
ranking vice chairperson. The chairperson of each division
shall be the administrative and executive officer of his or
her division, and it shall be his or her duty to supervise
and expedite the work of the division, and, in case of a tie
vote on any matter, the chairperson shall, at his or her
election, break the tie by his or her vote. Every motion or
question pending before the division upon which a tie exists
shall be deemed lost, and so declared by the chairperson of
the division, unless the chairperson shall elect to break
such tie by his or her vote.
5. (1) Any person appointed to the board, except a
public member, shall be a currently licensed architect,
licensed professional engineer, licensed professional land
surveyor [or], licensed professional landscape architect, or


licensed interior designer in Missouri, as the vacancy on
the board may require, who has been a resident of Missouri
for at least five years, who has been engaged in active
practice as an architect, professional engineer,
professional land surveyor [or], professional landscape
architect, or licensed interior designer, as the case may
be, for at least ten consecutive years as a Missouri
licensee immediately preceding such person's appointment,
and who is and has been a citizen of the United States for
at least five years immediately preceding such person's
appointment.
(2) (a) Active service as a faculty member while
holding the rank of assistant professor or higher in an
accredited school of engineering shall be regarded as active
100 practice of engineering, for the purposes of this chapter.
101 (b) Active service as a faculty member, after meeting
102 the qualifications required by section 327.314, while
103 holding the rank of assistant professor or higher in an
104 accredited school of engineering and teaching land surveying
105 courses shall be regarded as active practice of land
106 surveying for the purposes of this chapter.
107 (c) Active service as a faculty member while holding
108 the rank of assistant professor or higher in an accredited
109 school of landscape architecture shall be regarded as active
110 practice of landscape architecture, for the purposes of this
111 chapter.
112 (d) Active service as a faculty member while holding
113 the rank of assistant professor or higher in an accredited
114 school of architecture shall be regarded as active practice
115 of architecture for the purposes of this chapter; provided,
116 however, that no faculty member of an accredited school of
117 architecture shall be eligible for appointment to the board
118 unless such person has had at least three years' experience


119 in the active practice of architecture other than in
120 teaching.
121 (e) Active service as a faculty member while holding
122 the rank of assistant professor or higher in an accredited
123 school of interior design shall be regarded as active
124 practice of licensed interior design for the purposes of
125 this chapter, provided that no faculty member of an
126 accredited school of interior design shall be eligible for
127 appointment to the board unless such person has had at least
128 three years of experience in the active practice of licensed
129 interior design other than in teaching.
130 (3) The public member shall be, at the time of
131 appointment, a citizen of the United States; a resident of
132 this state for a period of one year and a registered voter;
133 a person who is not and never was a member of any profession
134 licensed or regulated pursuant to this chapter or the spouse
135 of such person; and a person who does not have and never has
136 had a material, financial interest in either the providing
137 of the professional services regulated by this chapter, or
138 an activity or organization directly related to any
139 profession licensed or regulated pursuant to this chapter.
140 All members, including public members, shall be chosen from
141 lists submitted by the director of the division of
142 professional registration. The duties of the public member
143 shall not include the determination of the technical
144 requirements to be met for licensure or whether any person
145 meets such technical requirements or of the technical
146 competence or technical judgment of a licensee or a
147 candidate for licensure.
148 6. The governor shall appoint the chairperson and the
149 other members of the board when a vacancy occurs either by
150 the expiration of a term or otherwise, and each board member
151 shall serve until such member's successor is appointed and


152 has qualified. The position of chairperson shall rotate
153 sequentially with an architect, then professional engineer,
154 then professional land surveyor, then licensed interior
155 designer, and then professional landscape architect, and
156 shall be a licensee who has previously served as a member of
157 the board. The appointment of the chairperson shall be for
158 a term of four years which shall be deemed to have begun on
159 the date of his or her appointment and shall end upon the
160 appointment of the chairperson's successor. The chairperson
161 shall not serve more than one term. All other appointments,
162 except to fill an unexpired term, shall be for terms of four
163 years; but no person shall serve on the board for more than
164 two consecutive four-year terms, and each four-year term
165 shall be deemed to have begun on the date of the expiration
166 of the term of the board member who is being replaced or
167 reappointed, as the case may be. Any appointment to the
168 board which is made when the senate is not in session shall
169 be submitted to the senate for its advice and consent at its
170 next session following the date of the appointment.
171 7. In the event that a vacancy is to occur on the
172 board because of the expiration of a term, then ninety days
173 prior to the expiration, or as soon as feasible after a
174 vacancy otherwise occurs, the president of the American
175 Institute of Architects/Missouri if the vacancy to be filled
176 requires the appointment of an architect, the president of
177 the Missouri Society of Professional Engineers if the
178 vacancy to be filled requires the appointment of a
179 professional engineer, the president of the Missouri Society
180 of Professional Surveyors if the vacancy to be filled
181 requires the appointment of a professional land surveyor,
182 [and] the president of the Missouri Association of Landscape
183 Architects if the vacancy to be filled requires the
184 appointment of a professional landscape architect, and the


185 president or other chief executive of any Missouri chapter
186 of the International Interior Design Association if the
187 vacancy to be filled requires the appointment of a licensed
188 interior designer, shall submit to the director of the
189 division of professional registration a list of five
190 architects [or], five professional engineers, [or] five
191 professional land surveyors, [or] five professional
192 landscape architects, or five licensed interior designers,
193 as the case may require, qualified and willing to fill the
194 vacancy in question, with the recommendation that the
195 governor appoint one of the five persons so listed; and with
196 the list of names so submitted, the president or other chief
197 executive of the appropriate organization shall include in a
198 letter of transmittal a description of the method by which
199 the names were chosen. This subsection shall not apply to
200 public member vacancies.
201 8. The board may sue and be sued as the Missouri board
202 for architects, professional engineers, professional land
203 surveyors [and], professional landscape architects, and
204 licensed interior designers, and its members need not be
205 named as parties. Members of the board shall not be
206 personally liable either jointly or severally for any act or
207 acts committed in the performance of their official duties
208 as board members, nor shall any board member be personally
209 liable for any court costs which accrue in any action by or
210 against the board.
211 9. Upon appointment by the governor and confirmation
212 by the senate of the two licensed interior designers to be
213 first appointed to the interior design division of the
214 board, the interior design council shall be abolished and
215 all of its powers, duties, and responsibilities shall be
216 transferred and imposed upon the board pursuant to this
217 section. Every act performed by or under the authority of


218 the board shall be deemed to have the same force and effect
219 as if performed by the interior design council pursuant to
220 the authority granted to the interior design council prior
221 to August 28, 2026. All rules of the interior design
222 council shall continue in effect and shall be deemed to be
223 duly adopted by the board until such rules are revised,
224 amended, or repealed by the board as provided by law, of
225 which such action shall be taken by the board on or before
226 January 1, 2027.
327.041. 1. The board shall have the duty and the
power to carry out the purposes and to enforce and
administer the provisions of this chapter, to require, by
summons or subpoena, with the vote of two-thirds of the
voting board members, the attendance and testimony of
witnesses, and the production of drawings, plans, plats,
specifications, books, papers or any document representing
any matter under hearing or investigation, pertaining to the
issuance, probation, suspension or revocation of
certificates of registration or certificates of authority
provided for in this chapter, or pertaining to the unlawful
practice of architecture, professional engineering,
professional land surveying [or], professional landscape
architecture, or licensed interior design.
2. The board shall, within the scope and purview of
the provisions of this chapter, prescribe the duties of its
officers and employees and adopt, publish and enforce the
rules and regulations of professional conduct which shall
establish and maintain appropriate standards of competence
and integrity in the professions of architecture,
professional engineering, professional land surveying [and],
professional landscape architecture, and licensed interior
design, and adopt, publish and enforce procedural rules and
regulations as may be considered by the board to be


necessary or proper for the conduct of the board's business
and the management of its affairs, and for the effective
administration and interpretation of the provisions of this
chapter. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this chapter shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and
any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2001, shall be
invalid and void.
3. Rules promulgated by the board pursuant to sections
327.272 to 327.635 shall be consistent with and shall not
supersede the rules promulgated by the department of natural
resources pursuant to chapter 60.
327.081. 1. All funds received pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter shall be deposited in the state
treasury to the credit of the "State Board for Architects,
Professional Engineers, Professional Land Surveyors [and],
Professional Landscape Architects, and Licensed Interior
Designers Fund" which is hereby established. All
expenditures authorized by this chapter shall be paid from
funds appropriated to the board by the general assembly from
this fund.
2. The provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary
notwithstanding, money in this fund shall not be transferred
and placed to the credit of general revenue until the amount
in the fund at the end of the biennium exceeds two times the
amount of the appropriation from the board's funds for the


preceding fiscal year or, if the board requires by rule
permit renewal less frequently than yearly, then three times
the appropriation from the board's funds for the preceding
fiscal year. The amount, if any, in the fund which shall
lapse is that amount in the fund which exceeds the
appropriate multiple of the appropriations from the board's
funds for the preceding fiscal year.
3. Upon appointment by the governor and confirmation
by the senate of the two licensed interior designers to be
first appointed to the interior design division of the
board, all moneys in the interior designer council fund
shall be transferred to the state board for architects,
professional engineers, professional land surveyors,
professional landscape architects, and licensed interior
designers fund. The interior designer council fund shall be
abolished upon the transfer of all moneys in the fund to the
state board for architects, professional engineers,
professional land surveyors, professional landscape
architects, and licensed interior designers fund.
327.381. The board may license, in its discretion, any
architect, professional engineer, professional land
surveyor, or professional landscape architect who is
licensed, or any interior designer who is licensed,
certified, or registered, in another state or territory of
the United States, province of Canada, or in another
country, when such applicant has qualifications which are at
least equivalent to the requirements for licensure as an
architect, professional engineer, professional land
surveyor, [or] professional landscape architect, or licensed
interior designer in this state, and provided further that
the board may establish by rule the conditions under which
it shall require any such applicant to take any examination


it considers necessary, and provided further that any such
application is accompanied by the required fee.
327.411. 1. Each architect and each professional
engineer and each professional land surveyor and each
professional landscape architect and each licensed interior
designer shall have a personal seal in a form prescribed by
the board, and he or she shall affix the seal to all final
technical submissions. Technical submissions shall include,
but are not limited to, drawings, specifications, plats,
surveys, exhibits, reports, and certifications of
construction prepared by the licensee, or under such
licensee's immediate personal supervision. Such licensee
shall either prepare or personally supervise the preparation
of all documents sealed by the licensee, and such licensee
shall be held personally responsible for the contents of all
such documents sealed by such licensee, whether prepared or
drafted by another licensee or not.
2. The personal seal of an architect or professional
engineer or professional land surveyor or professional
landscape architect or licensed interior designer shall be
the legal equivalent of the licensee's signature whenever
and wherever used, and the owner of the seal shall be
responsible for the architectural, engineering, land
surveying, [or] landscape architectural, or interior design
documents, as the case may be, when the licensee places his
or her personal seal on such technical submissions to be
used in connection with, any architectural or engineering
project, survey, [or] landscape architectural project, or
interior alteration or construction project, as such term is
defined in section 327.700. Licensees shall undertake to
perform architectural, professional engineering,
professional land surveying [and], professional landscape
architectural, and licensed interior design services only


when they are qualified by education, training, and
experience in the specific technical areas involved.
3. Notwithstanding any provision of this section, any
architect, professional engineer, professional land
surveyor, [or] professional landscape architect, or licensed
interior designer may, but is not required to, attach a
statement over his or her signature, authenticated by his or
her personal seal, specifying the particular technical
submissions, or portions thereof, intended to be
authenticated by the seal, and disclaiming any
responsibility for all other technical submissions relating
to or intended to be used for any part or parts of the
architectural or engineering project [or], survey [or],
landscape architectural project, or interior alteration or
construction project, as such term is defined in section
327.700.
4. Nothing in this section, or any rule or regulation
of the board shall require any professional to seal
preliminary or incomplete documents.
327.442. 1. At such time as the final trial
proceedings are concluded whereby a licensee, or any person
who has failed to renew or has surrendered his or her
certificate of licensure or authority, has been finally
adjudicated and found guilty, or has entered a plea of
guilty or nolo contendere, in a [felony] criminal
prosecution pursuant to the laws of [this] any state, [the
laws of any other state, territory, or the laws] of the
United States [of America], or of any country for any
offense [reasonably] directly related to the
[qualifications, functions, or] duties [of a licensee
pursuant to this chapter or any felony offense, an essential
element of which is fraud, dishonesty, or an act of
violence, or for any felony offense involving moral


turpitude,] and responsibilities of the occupation, as set
forth in section 324.012, regardless of whether or not
sentence is imposed, the board for architects, professional
engineers, professional land surveyors [and], professional
landscape architects, and licensed interior designers may
hold a disciplinary hearing to singly or in combination
censure or place the licensee named in the complaint on
probation on such terms and conditions as the board deems
appropriate for a period not to exceed five years, or may
suspend, for a period not to exceed three years, or revoke
the license or certificate.
2. Anyone who has been revoked or denied a license or
certificate to practice in another state may automatically
be denied a license or certificate to practice in this
state. However, the board for architects, professional
engineers, professional land surveyors [and], professional
landscape architects, and licensed interior designers may
establish other qualifications by which a person may
ultimately be qualified and licensed to practice in Missouri.
327.451. 1. Any person who believes that an architect
or a professional engineer or a professional land surveyor
or a professional landscape architect or a licensed interior
designer has acted or failed to act so that his or her
license or certificate of authority should, pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter, be suspended or revoked, or who
believes that any applicant for a license or certificate of
authority pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is not
entitled to a license or a certificate of authority, may
file a written affidavit with the executive director of the
board which the affiant shall sign and swear to and in which
the affiant shall clearly set forth the reasons for the
affiant's charge or charges that the license or certificate
of authority of an architect or professional engineer or


professional land surveyor or professional landscape
architect or licensed interior designer should be suspended
or revoked or not renewed or that a license or certificate
of authority should not be issued to an applicant.
2. If the affidavit so filed does not contain
statements of fact which if true would authorize, pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter, suspension or revocation
of the accused's license or certificate of authority, or
does not contain statements of fact which if true would
authorize, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the
refusal of the renewal of an existing license or certificate
of authority or the refusal of a license or certificate of
authority to an applicant, the board shall either dismiss
the charge or charges or, within its discretion, cause an
investigation to be made of the charges contained in the
affidavit, after which investigation the board shall either
dismiss the charge or charges or proceed against the accused
by written complaint as provided in subsection 3 of this
section.
3. If the affidavit contains statements of fact which
if true would authorize pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter the revocation or suspension of an accused's license
or certificate of authority, the board shall cause an
investigation to be made of the charge or charges contained
in the affidavit and unless the investigation discloses the
falsity of the facts upon which the charge or charges in the
affidavit are based, the board shall file with and in the
administrative hearing commission a written complaint
against the accused setting forth the cause or causes for
which the accused's license or certificate of authority
should be suspended or revoked. Thereafter, the board shall
be governed by and shall proceed in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 621.


4. If the charges contained in the affidavit filed
with the board would constitute a cause or causes for which
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter an accused's
license or certificate of authority should not be renewed or
a cause or causes for which pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter a certificate should not be issued, the board
shall cause an investigation to be made of the charge or
charges and unless the investigation discloses the falsity
of the facts upon which the charge or charges contained in
the affidavit are based, the board shall refuse to permit an
applicant to be examined upon the applicant's qualifications
for licensure or shall refuse to issue or renew a license or
certificate of authority, as the case may require.
5. The provisions of this section shall not be so
construed as to prevent the board on its own initiative from
instituting and conducting investigations and based thereon
to make written complaints in and to the administrative
hearing commission.
6. If for any reason the provisions of chapter 621
become inapplicable to the board, then, and in that event,
the board shall proceed to charge, adjudicate and otherwise
act in accordance with the provisions of chapter 536.
[324.400.] 327.700. As used in sections [324.400 to
324.439] 327.700 to 327.750, the following terms mean:
(1) ["Council", the interior design council created in
section 324.406;
(2) "Division", the division of professional
registration;
(3) "Registered interior designer", a design
professional who provides services including preparation of
documents and specifications relative to nonload-bearing
interior construction, furniture, finishes, fixtures and
equipment and who meets the criteria of education,


experience and examination as provided in sections 324.400
to 324.439] "Building equipment", any mechanical, plumbing,
electrical, or structural components, including a
conveyance, designed for or located in a building or
structure;
(2) "Conveyance", an elevator, dumbwaiter, vertical
reciprocating conveyor, escalator, or other motorized
vertical transportation system;
(3) "Interior alteration or construction project", a
project, including construction, modification, renovation,
rehabilitation, or historic preservation, for an interior
space or area within a proposed or existing building or
structure that involves changing or altering:
(a) The design function or layout of a room; or
(b) The state of permanent fixtures or equipment;
(4) "Interior nonstructural element", an interior
design element that does not require structural bracing and
that is not load-bearing according to any applicable
building codes;
(5) "Interior technical submission", the designs,
drawings, and specifications that establish the scope of the
interior alteration or construction project, the standard of
quality for any materials, workmanship, equipment, and
construction systems of an interior alteration or
construction project, and the studies and other technical
reports and calculations prepared in the course of the
practice of licensed interior design;
(6) "Practice of licensed interior design", the design
of interior spaces as a part of an interior alteration or
construction project in conformity with public health,
safety, and welfare requirements, including the preparation
of documents relating to building code descriptions, project
egress plans that require no increase in the capacity of


exits in the space affected, space planning, and finish
materials, and the preparation of documents and interior
technical submissions relating to an interior alteration or
construction project. The term "practice of licensed
interior design":
(a) Shall include:
a. The programming, planning, pre-design analysis, and
conceptual design of any interior nonstructural elements
including, but not limited to, the selection of materials,
except for building equipment;
b. The alteration or construction of any interior
nonstructural elements and any interior technical
submissions related to such alteration or construction;
c. The preparation of a physical plan of space within
a proposed or existing building or structure, including:
(i) Determinations of circulation systems or patterns;
(ii) Determinations of the location of exit
requirements based on occupancy loads; and
(iii) Assessments and analyses of any interior safety
factors to comply with applicable building codes related to
interior nonstructural elements;
d. The rendering of designs, plans, drawings,
specifications, contract documents, or other interior
technical submissions; and
e. The administration of the construction of interior
nonstructural elements and contracts relating to interior
nonstructural elements in the interior alteration or
construction of a proposed or existing building or
structure; and
(b) Shall not include:
a. Services or work that constitute the practice of
architecture, as provided in section 327.091, except as
otherwise provided for in this chapter;


b. Services or work that constitute the practice of
professional engineering, as provided in section 327.181;
c. Services or work that constitute the practice of
professional land surveying, as provided in section 327.272;
d. Services or work that constitute the practice of
professional landscape architecture, as defined in section
327.600;
e. Altering or affecting the structural system and
seismic system of a building, including changing the
building's live or dead load on the structural system;
f. Changes to the building envelope, including
exterior walls, exterior wall coverings, exterior wall
openings, exterior windows or doors, architectural trim,
balconies and similar projections, bay or oriel windows,
roof assemblies and rooftop structures, and glass and
glazing for exterior use in both vertical, horizontal, and
sloped applications in buildings and structures;
g. Altering or affecting the mechanical, plumbing,
heating, air conditioning, ventilation, electrical, vertical
transportation, fire sprinkler, or fire alarm systems, and
any building elements, spaces, or areas that are for the
purpose of containing such systems;
100 h. Changes beyond the exit access component of a means
101 of egress system;
102 i. Construction that materially affects any life
103 safety systems pertaining to fire safety or fire protection
104 of structural elements, smoke evacuation and
105 compartmentalization systems, or fire-rated vertical shafts
106 in multi-story structures;
107 j. Changes to the existing use group for an occupancy;
108 k. Changes to the construction classification of the
109 building or structure according to any applicable building
110 codes;


111 l. Creating or modifying any atriums, floor openings,
112 community spaces, or vertical openings; or
113 m. Any person who renders services within the practice
114 of licensed interior design in connection with the
115 construction, remodeling, or repairing of any privately
116 owned building described in item (i), (ii), or (iii) of this
117 subparagraph, and who indicates on any drawings,
118 specifications, estimates, reports, or other documents
119 furnished in connection with the services within the
120 practice of licensed interior design that the person is not
121 a licensed interior designer:
122 (i) A dwelling house;
123 (ii) A multiple family dwelling house, flat, or
124 apartment containing not more than two families; or
125 (iii) Any one building or structure, except for those
126 buildings or structures used exclusively for agricultural
127 purposes, which provides for the employment, assembly,
128 housing, sleeping, or eating of not more than nine persons,
129 contains less than two thousand square feet, and is not part
130 of another building or structure.
[324.402.] 327.705. The state or any county,
municipality, or other political subdivision shall not
require the use of a [registered] licensed interior designer
for any residential building, residential remodeling,
residential rehabilitation, or residential construction
purposes.
[324.403.] 327.710. 1. No person may use the name or
title, [registered] licensed interior designer, in this
state unless that person is [registered] licensed as
required by sections [324.400 to 324.439] 327.700 to 327.750.
2. A licensed interior designer shall undertake to
perform services within the practice of licensed interior
design only when he or she is qualified by education,


training, and experience in the specific technical areas
involved.
3. Licensed interior designers shall be in responsible
charge of interior design technical submissions that can
affect the health, safety, and welfare of the public within
their scope of practice. Licensed interior designers shall
not take responsible charge over interior technical
submissions prepared by another person unless the licensed
interior designer reviewing such interior technical
submissions actually exercises personal supervision and
direct control over the interior technical submissions.
Nothing in [sections 324.400 to 324.439] this chapter shall
be construed as limiting or preventing the practice of a
person's interior design profession or restricting a person
from providing [interior design] services within the
practice of licensed interior design, provided such person
does not indicate to the public that such person is
[registered] licensed as an interior designer pursuant to
the provisions of sections [324.400 to 324.439] 327.700 to
327.750.
4. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as in
any way precluding an architect from performing any of the
services included within the practice of licensed interior
design.
[324.409.] 327.720. 1. To be a [registered] licensed
interior designer, a person:
(1) Shall take and pass or have passed the examination
administered by the [National] Council for Interior Design
Qualification or an equivalent examination approved by the
[division] board. In addition to proof of passage of the
examination, the application shall provide substantial
evidence to the [division] board that the applicant:


(a) Is a graduate of a five-year or four-year
accredited degree program from a school of interior design
[program from an accredited institution] and has completed
at least two years of diversified and appropriate interior
design experience; or
(b) [Has completed at least three years of an interior
design curriculum from an accredited institution and has
completed at least three years of diversified and
appropriate interior design experience; or
(c)] Is a graduate of a two-year accredited degree
program from a school of interior design [program from an
accredited institution] and has completed at least four
years of diversified and appropriate interior design
experience; or
(2) May qualify who is currently [registered] licensed
pursuant to sections 327.091 to 327.171, and section 327.401
pertaining to the practice of architecture [and registered
with the division. Such applicant shall give authorization
to the division in order to verify current registration with
sections 327.091 to 327.171 and section 327.401 pertaining
to the practice of architecture].
2. An applicant whose curriculum or transcript has
been approved by the board shall be exempt from the
requirement to provide substantial evidence that the
applicant meets the requirements of paragraph (a) or (b) of
subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section.
3. The [division] board shall verify if an applicant
has complied with the provisions of this section and has
paid the required fees, then the [division] board shall
recommend such applicant be [registered] licensed as a
[registered] licensed interior designer by the [division]
board.


[324.415.] 327.725. Applications for [registration]
licensure as a [registered] licensed interior designer shall
be typewritten on forms prescribed by the [division] board
and furnished to the applicant. The application shall
contain the applicant's statements showing the applicant's
education, experience, results of previous interior design
certification, registration, or licensing examinations, if
any, and such other pertinent information as the [division]
board may require, or architect's license or registration
number and such other pertinent information as the
[division] board may require. Each application shall
contain a statement that is made under oath or affirmation
and that the representations are true and correct to the
best knowledge and belief of the person signing the
application. The person shall be subject to the penalties
for making a false affidavit or declaration and shall be
accompanied by the required fee.
[324.418.] 327.730. 1. The [certificate of
registration] license issued biennially to a [registered]
licensed interior designer pursuant to sections [324.400 to
324.439] 327.700 to 327.750 shall be renewed on or before
the [certificate] license renewal date accompanied by the
required fee. The [certificate of registration] license of
a [registered] licensed interior designer which is not
renewed within three months after the [certificate] license
renewal date shall be suspended automatically, subject to
the right of the holder to have the suspended [certificate
of registration] license reinstated within nine months of
the date of suspension if the person pays the required
reinstatement fee. Any [certificate of registration]
license suspended and not reinstated within nine months of
the suspension date shall expire and be void and the holder
of such [certificate] license shall have no rights or


privileges provided to holders of valid [certificates]
licenses. Any person whose [certificate of registration]
license has expired may, upon demonstration of current
qualifications and payment of required fees, be
[reregistered] relicensed or reauthorized under the person's
original [certificate of registration] license number.
2. Each application for the renewal or reinstatement
of a [registration] license shall be on a form furnished to
the applicant and shall be accompanied by the required fees
[and proof of current completion of at least one unit every
two years of approved or verifiable continuing education in
interior design or architecture, immediately prior to such
renewal or reinstatement. Ten contact hours constitutes one
continuing education unit. Five contact hours of teaching
in interior design or architecture constitutes one
continuing education unit. One college course credit in
interior design or architecture constitutes one continuing
education unit].
3. The board shall establish, by rule, continuing
education requirements as a condition to renewing or
reinstating the license of an interior designer that are
substantially equivalent to the continuing education
requirements for architects.
[324.427.] 327.735. It is unlawful for any person to
advertise or indicate to the public that the person is a
[registered] licensed interior designer in this state,
unless such person is [registered] licensed as a
[registered] licensed interior designer by the [division]
board and is in good standing pursuant to sections [324.400
to 324.439] 327.700 to 327.750.
[324.430.] 327.740. No person may use the designation
[registered] licensed interior designer in Missouri, unless
the [division] board has issued a current [certificate of


registration] license certifying that the person has been
duly [registered] licensed as a [registered] licensed
interior designer in Missouri and unless such [registration]
license has been renewed or reinstated as provided in
section [324.418] 327.730.
[324.433.] 327.745. The right to use the title of
[registered] licensed interior designer shall be deemed a
personal right, based upon the qualifications of the
individual, evidenced by the person's current [certificate
of registration] license and such [certificate] license is
not transferable; except that, a [registered] licensed
interior designer may perform the [interior designer's
profession] practice of licensed interior design through, or
as a member of, or as an employee of, a partnership or
corporation.
[324.439.] 327.750. [After twenty-four months after
August 28, 1998,] Any person who violates any provision of
sections [324.400 to 324.439] 327.700 to 327.750 shall be
guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
537.033. 1. As used in this section, unless the
context clearly indicates otherwise, the following words and
terms shall have the meanings indicated:
(1) "Design professional", an architect, landscape
architect, professional land surveyor, [or] professional
engineer, or licensed interior designer licensed under the
provisions of chapter 327 or any corporation authorized to
practice architecture, landscape architecture, land
surveying, or engineering under section 327.401 while acting
within their scope of practice;
(2) "Lessons learned", internal meetings, classes,
publications in any medium, presentations, lectures, or
other means of teaching and communicating after substantial
completion of the project which are conducted solely and


exclusively by and with the employees, partners, and
coworkers of the design professional who prepared the
project's design for the purpose of learning best practices
and reducing errors and omissions in design documents and
procedures. Lessons learned shall not include
presentations, lectures, teaching, or communication made to
or by third parties who are not employees, partners, and
coworkers of the design professional whose work is being
evaluated and discussed;
(3) "Peer review process", a process through which
design professionals evaluate, maintain, or monitor the
quality and utilization of architectural, landscape
architectural, land surveying, [or] engineering, or interior
design services, prepare internal lessons learned, or
exercise any combination of such responsibilities;
(4) "Substantial completion", the construction of the
project covered by the design professional's design
documents has reached substantial completion, as that term
is defined in section 436.327.
2. A peer review process shall only be performed by a
design professional licensed in any jurisdiction in the
United States in the same profession as would be required
under chapter 327 to prepare the design documents being
reviewed, or in a case requiring multiple professions, by a
person or persons holding the proper licenses. A peer
review process may be performed by one or more design
professionals appointed by the partners, shareholders, board
of directors, chief executive officer, quality control
director, or employed design professionals of a partnership
or of a corporation authorized under section 327.401 to
practice architecture, landscape architecture, land
surveying, or engineering, or by the owner of a sole
proprietorship engaged in one or more of such professions.


Any individual identified in this subsection and performing
a peer review shall be deemed a peer reviewer.
3. Each peer reviewer described in this subsection
shall be immune from civil liability for such acts so long
as the acts are performed in good faith, without malice, and
are reasonably related to the scope of inquiry of the peer
review process. The immunity in this subsection is intended
to cover only outside peer reviews by a third-party design
professional who is not an employee, coworker, or partner of
the design professional whose design is being peer reviewed
before substantial completion of the project and who has no
other role in the project besides performing the peer review.
4. This section does not provide immunity to any in-
house peer reviewer when performed by employees, coworkers,
or partners of the design professional who prepares the
design, nor are any such documents or peer review comments,
other than lessons learned, inadmissible into evidence in
any judicial or administrative action.
5. Except for documents related to lessons learned,
the interviews, memoranda, proceedings, findings,
deliberations, reports, and minutes of the peer review
process, or the existence of the same, concerning the
professional services provided to a client or member of the
public are subject to discovery, subpoena, or other means of
legal compulsion for their release to any person or entity
and shall be admissible into evidence in any judicial or
administrative action for failure to provide appropriate
architectural, landscape architectural, land surveying, [or]
engineering, or interior design services, subject to
applicable rules of the court or tribunal. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, no person who was in
attendance at, or participated in, any lessons learned
process or proceedings shall be permitted or required to


disclose any information acquired in connection with or in
the course of such proceeding, or to disclose any opinion,
recommendation, or evaluation made in a lessons learned
process or proceeding; provided, however, that information
otherwise discoverable or admissible from original sources
is not to be construed as immune from discovery or use in
any proceeding merely because it was presented during a
lessons learned process or proceeding nor is a member,
employee, or agent involved in any such process or
proceeding, or other person appearing before a peer
reviewer, to be prevented from testifying as to matters
within his or her personal knowledge and in accordance with
the other provisions of this section, but such witness
cannot be questioned about a lessons learned process or
proceeding or about opinions formed as a result of such
process or proceeding. The disclosure of any memoranda,
proceedings, reports, or minutes of a lessons learned
proceeding to any person or entity, including but not
limited to governmental agencies, professional accrediting
100 agencies, or other design professionals, whether proper or
101 improper, shall not waive or have any effect upon its
102 confidentiality, nondiscoverability, or nonadmissibility.
103 6. Nothing in this section shall limit authority
104 otherwise provided by law of the Missouri board for
105 architects, professional engineers, professional land
106 surveyors, [and] professional landscape architects, and
107 licensed interior designers to obtain information by
108 subpoena or other authorized process from a peer reviewer or
109 to require disclosure of otherwise confidential information
110 relating to matters and investigations within the
111 jurisdiction of such licensing board.
621.045. 1. The administrative hearing commission
shall conduct hearings and make findings of fact and


conclusions of law in those cases when, under the law, a
license issued by any of the following agencies may be
revoked or suspended or when the licensee may be placed on
probation or when an agency refuses to permit an applicant
to be examined upon his or her qualifications or refuses to
issue or renew a license of an applicant who has passed an
examination for licensure or who possesses the
qualifications for licensure without examination:
Missouri State Board of Accountancy
Missouri State Board for Architects, Professional
Engineers, Professional Land Surveyors [and], Professional
Landscape Architects, and Licensed Interior Designers
Board of Barber Examiners
Board of Cosmetology
Board of Chiropody and Podiatry
Board of Chiropractic Examiners
Missouri Dental Board
Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors
Board of Registration for the Healing Arts
Board of Nursing
Board of Optometry
Board of Pharmacy
Missouri Real Estate Commission
Missouri Veterinary Medical Board
Supervisor of Liquor Control
Department of Health and Senior Services
Department of Commerce and Insurance
Department of Mental Health
Board of Private Investigator Examiners.
2. If in the future there are created by law any new
or additional administrative agencies which have the power
to issue, revoke, suspend, or place on probation any


license, then those agencies are under the provisions of
this law.
3. The administrative hearing commission is authorized
to conduct hearings and make findings of fact and
conclusions of law in those cases brought by the Missouri
state board for architects, professional engineers,
professional land surveyors [and], professional landscape
architects, and licensed interior designers against
unlicensed persons under section 327.076.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section
to the contrary, after August 28, 1995, in order to
encourage settlement of disputes between any agency
described in subsection 1 or 2 of this section and its
licensees, any such agency shall:
(1) Provide the licensee with a written description of
the specific conduct for which discipline is sought and a
citation to the law and rules allegedly violated, together
with copies of any documents which are the basis thereof and
the agency's initial settlement offer, or file a contested
case against the licensee;
(2) If no contested case has been filed against the
licensee, allow the licensee at least sixty days, from the
date of mailing, to consider the agency's initial settlement
offer and to contact the agency to discuss the terms of such
settlement offer;
(3) If no contested case has been filed against the
licensee, advise the licensee that the licensee may, either
at the time the settlement agreement is signed by all
parties, or within fifteen days thereafter, submit the
agreement to the administrative hearing commission for
determination that the facts agreed to by the parties to the
settlement constitute grounds for denying or disciplining
the license of the licensee; and


(4) In any contact under this subsection by the agency
or its counsel with a licensee who is not represented by
counsel, advise the licensee that the licensee has the right
to consult an attorney at the licensee's own expense.
5. If the licensee desires review by the
administrative hearing commission under subdivision (3) of
subsection 4 of this section at any time prior to the
settlement becoming final, the licensee may rescind and
withdraw from the settlement and any admissions of fact or
law in the agreement shall be deemed withdrawn and not
admissible for any purposes under the law against the
licensee. Any settlement submitted to the administrative
hearing commission shall not be effective and final unless
and until findings of fact and conclusions of law are
entered by the administrative hearing commission that the
facts agreed to by the parties to the settlement constitute
grounds for denying or disciplining the license of the
licensee.
6. When a holder of a license, registration, permit,
or certificate of authority issued by the division of
professional registration or a board, commission, or
committee of the division of professional registration
against whom an affirmative decision is sought has failed to
plead or otherwise respond in the contested case and
adequate notice has been given under sections 536.067 and
621.100 upon a properly pled writing filed to initiate the
contested case under this chapter or chapter 536, a default
decision shall be entered against the licensee without
further proceedings. The default decision shall grant such
relief as requested by the division of professional
registration, board, committee, commission, or office in the
writing initiating the contested case as allowed by law.
100 Upon motion stating facts constituting a meritorious defense


101 and for good cause shown, a default decision may be set
102 aside. The motion shall be made within a reasonable time,
103 not to exceed thirty days after entry of the default
104 decision. "Good cause" includes a mistake or conduct that
105 is not intentionally or recklessly designed to impede the
106 administrative process.
[324.406. 1. There is hereby created
within the division of professional registration
a council to be known as the "Interior Design
Council". The council shall consist of four
interior designers and one public member
appointed by the director of the division. The
director shall give due consideration to the
recommendations by state organizations of the
interior design profession for the appointment
of the interior design members to the council.
Council members shall be appointed to serve a
term of four years; except that of the members
first appointed, one interior design member and
the public member shall be appointed for terms
of four years, one member shall be appointed for
a term of three years, one member shall be
appointed for a term of two years and one member
shall be appointed for a term of one year. No
member of the council shall serve more than two
terms.
2. Each council member, other than the
public member, shall be a citizen of the United
States, a resident of the state of Missouri for
at least one year, meet the qualifications for
professional registration, practice interior
design as the person's principal livelihood and,
except for the first members appointed, be
registered pursuant to sections 324.400 to
324.439 as an interior designer.
3. The public member shall be, at the time
of such person's appointment, a citizen of the
United States, a registered voter, a person who
is not and never was a member of the profession
regulated by sections 324.400 to 324.439 or the
spouse of such a person and a person who does
not have and never has had a material financial
interest in the providing of the professional


services regulated by sections 324.400 to
324.439. The duties of the public member shall
not include the determination of the technical
requirements for the registration of persons as
interior designers.
4. The provisions of section 324.028
pertaining to members of certain state boards
and commissions shall apply to all members of
the council.
5. Members of the council may be removed
from office for cause. Upon the death,
resignation or removal from office of any member
of the council, the appointment to fill the
vacancy shall be for the unexpired portion of
the term so vacated and shall be filled in the
same manner as the first appointment and due
notice be given to the state organizations of
the interior design profession prior to the
appointment.
6. Each member of the council may receive
as compensation an amount set by the division
not to exceed fifty dollars per day and shall be
reimbursed for the member's reasonable and
necessary expenses incurred in the official
performance of the member's duties as a member
of the council. The director shall establish by
rule guidelines for payment.
7. The council shall meet at least twice
each year and guide, advise, and make
recommendations to the division on matters
within the scope of sections 324.400 to
324.439. The organization of the council shall
be established by the members of the council.]
[324.412. The division shall:
(1) Employ, within the limits of the
appropriations for that purpose, such employees
as are necessary to carry out the provisions of
sections 324.400 to 324.439;
(2) Exercise all budgeting, purchasing,
reporting and other related management functions;
(3) Recommend prosecution for violations
of sections 324.400 to 324.439 to the
appropriate prosecuting or circuit attorney;
(4) Promulgate such rules and regulations
as are necessary to administer the provisions of


sections 324.400 to 324.439. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is promulgated to
administer and enforce sections 324.400 to
324.439, shall become effective only if the
agency has fully complied with all of the
requirements of chapter 536, including but not
limited to, section 536.028, if applicable,
after August 28, 1998. If the provisions of
section 536.028 apply, the provisions of this
section are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant
to section 536.028 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a
rule or portion of a rule are held
unconstitutional or invalid, the purported grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule so proposed
and contained in the order of rulemaking shall
be invalid and void, except that nothing in this
section shall affect the validity of any rule
adopted and promulgated prior to August 28,
1998.]
[324.421. The division shall register
without examination any interior designer
certified, licensed or registered in a foreign
country if the applicant has qualifications
which are at least equivalent to the
requirements for registration as a registered
interior designer in this state and such
applicant pays the required fees.]
[324.424. 1. The division shall set the
amount of the fees authorized by sections
324.400 to 324.439 by rules and regulations.
The fees shall be set at a level to produce
revenue which shall not substantially exceed the
cost and expense of administering sections
324.400 to 324.439. All fees required pursuant
to sections 324.400 to 324.439 shall be paid to
and collected by the division of professional
registration and transmitted to the department
of revenue for deposit in the state treasury to
the credit of the "Interior Designer Council
Fund", which is hereby created.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 33.080 to the contrary, money in the


fund shall not be transferred and placed to the
credit of general revenue until the amount in
the fund at the end of the biennium exceeds
three times the amount of the appropriation to
the council for the preceding fiscal year. The
amount, if any, in the fund which shall lapse is
the amount in the fund which exceeds the
appropriate multiple of the appropriations to
the council for the preceding fiscal year.]
[324.436. 1. The division may refuse to
issue any certificate required pursuant to
sections 324.400 to 324.439, or renew or
reinstate any such certificate, for any one or
any combination of the reasons stated in
subsection 2 of this section. The division
shall notify the applicant in writing of the
reasons for the refusal and shall advise the
applicant of the person's right to file a
complaint with the administrative hearing
commission as provided in chapter 621.
2. The division may cause a complaint to
be filed with the administrative hearing
commission as provided by chapter 621 against
any holder of a certificate of registration
required by sections 324.400 to 324.439 or any
person who has failed to renew or has
surrendered the person's certificate of
registration for any one or combination of the
following reasons:
(1) The person has been finally
adjudicated and found guilty, or entered a plea
of guilty or nolo contendere, in a criminal
prosecution under the laws of any state or of
the United States, or of any country, for any
offense directly related to the duties and
responsibilities of the occupation, as set forth
in section 324.012, regardless of whether or not
sentence is imposed;
(2) Use of fraud, deception,
misrepresentation or bribery in securing any
certificate of registration issued pursuant to
sections 324.400 to 324.439 or in obtaining
permission to take any examination given or
required pursuant to sections 324.400 to 324.439;


(3) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any
fee, charge, tuition or other compensation by
fraud, deception or misrepresentation;
(4) Incompetency, misconduct, gross
negligence, fraud, misrepresentation or
dishonesty in the performance of the functions
or duties of the profession regulated by
sections 324.400 to 324.439;
(5) Violation of, or assisting or enabling
any person to violate, any provision of sections
324.400 to 324.439, or of any lawful rule or
regulation adopted pursuant to such sections;
(6) Impersonation of any person holding a
certificate of registration or authority, permit
or license or allowing any person to use the
person's certificate or diploma from any school;
(7) Disciplinary action against the holder
of a certificate of registration or other right
to perform the profession regulated by sections
324.400 to 324.439 granted by another state,
territory, federal agency or country upon
grounds for which revocation or suspension is
authorized in this state;
(8) A person is finally adjudged insane or
incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(9) Issuance of a certificate of
registration based upon a material mistake of
fact;
(10) Use of any advertisement or
solicitation which is false, misleading or
deceptive to the general public or persons to
whom the advertisement or solicitation is
primarily directed, as it relates to the
interior design profession.
3. After the filing of a complaint
pursuant to subsection 2 of this section, the
proceedings shall be conducted in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 536 and chapter
621. Upon a finding by the administrative
hearing commission that the grounds, provided in
subsection 2 of this section, for disciplinary
action are met, the division shall censure or
place the person named in the complaint on
probation for a period not to exceed five years
or may suspend the person's certificate for a


period not to exceed three years or may revoke
the person's certificate of registration.]
Section B. The repeal of sections 324.406 and 324.424
shall become effective upon notification to the revisor from
the director of the division of professional registration of
the department of commerce and insurance of the appointment
and confirmation of two members to the interior design
division of the Missouri board for architects, professional
engineers, professional land surveyors, professional
landscape architects, and licensed interior designers.